Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-352
Federal savings and loan association; conversion into state association; status of property owned; obligation.

All of the property of such association, including all of its right, title, and interest in and to all property of every kind and character whether real, personal, or mixed, shall immediately, by operation of law, without any conveyance or transfer whatsoever, and without any further act or deed, continue to be vested in said association under its new name and style as a state association and under its new jurisdiction. Such state association shall have, hold, and enjoy the same in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the same was possessed, held, and enjoyed by it as a federal savings and loan association. The said state association at the time of the taking effect of such conversion shall continue to be responsible for all the obligations of said federal savings and loan association to the same extent as though said conversion had not taken place.

Laws 1949, c. 7, § 2(2), p. 67.